data/lexd/20-adjectives.lexd
LEXICON InflN_P25comp_x
<Sg><Nom>:·aisi[gFem]
<Sg><Nom>:·aisis[gMsc]
<Sg><Nom>:·aisi[gNeut]
<Sg><Gen>:·aišas[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]
<Sg><Dat>:·aišai[gFem]
<Sg><Dat>:·aišasmu[gMsc]
<Sg><Dat>:·aišasmu[gNeut]
<Sg><Acc>:·aisin[gFem]
<Sg><Acc>:·aisin[gMsc]
<Sg><Acc>:·aisi[gNeut]
<Pl><Nom>:·aisis[gFem]
<Pl><Nom>:·aišai[gMsc]
<Pl><Nom>:·aišai[gNeut]
<Pl><Gen>:·aisin[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]
<Pl><Dat>:·aisimans[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]
<Pl><Acc>:·aisins[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]

LEXICON InflN_P25sup_x
<Sg><Nom>:·aisi[gFem]
<Sg><Nom>:·aisis[gMsc]
<Sg><Nom>:·aisi[gNeut]
<Sg><Gen>:·aišas[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]
<Sg><Dat>:·aišai[gFem]
<Sg><Dat>:·aišasmu[gMsc]
<Sg><Dat>:·aišasmu[gNeut]
<Sg><Acc>:·aisin[gFem]
<Sg><Acc>:·aisin[gMsc]
<Sg><Acc>:·aisi[gNeut]
<Pl><Nom>:·aisis[gFem]
<Pl><Nom>:·aišai[gMsc]
<Pl><Nom>:·aišai[gNeut]
<Pl><Gen>:·aisin[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]
<Pl><Dat>:·aisimans[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]
<Pl><Acc>:·aisins[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]
